pt-PT: Nível de completude do kit do avião de controlo remoto: ARF (quase pronto a voar); BNF (ligar e voar); KIT (kit por montar); PNP (ligar e usar); RR (preparado para recetor); RTF (pronto a voar); Outro
en: Remote control plane kit completion level: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (Unassembled kit); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Ready-to-Fly); Other
nb: Fullføringsnivå for fjernstyrt flysett: ARF (nesten klar til å fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); Byggesett (umontert); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (klar for mottaker); RTF (klar til å fly); Annet
ko: 원격 조종 비행기 키트 완성 수준: ARF(반조립); BNF(Bind-N-Fly); KIT(미조립 키트); PNP(플러그 앤 플레이); RR(수신기 준비 완료); RTF(완전 조립); 기타
fr: Niveau de complétude du kit d’avion radiocommandé: ARF (presque prêt à voler); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (non assemblé); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (prêt pour le récepteur); RTF (prêt à voler); Autre
zh-TW: 遙控飛機套件完成度: ARF (接近即飛); BNF (綁定即飛); KIT (未組裝套件); PNP (隨插即用); RR (接收機就緒); RTF (即飛); 其他
es: Nivel de finalización del kit de avión a control remoto: ARF (Casi listo para volar); BNF (Enlazar y volar); KIT (Kit sin ensamblar); PNP (Conectar y usar); RR (Listo para el receptor); RTF (Listo para volar); Otro
sk-SK: Úroveň kompletnosti súpravy lietadla na diaľkové ovládanie: ARF (takmer pripravené na let); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (nezostavená súprava); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (pripravené na prijímač); RTF (pripravené na let); Iné
sv: Radiostyrt flygplan – kitets färdigställandenivå: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (omonterad byggsats); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Ready-to-Fly); Annat
tr: Uzaktan kumandalı uçak set tamlık seviyesi: ARF (Neredeyse uçuşa hazır); BNF (Bağla ve uçur); KIT (Demonte kit); PNP (Tak ve çalıştır); RR (Alıcıya hazır); RTF (Uçuşa hazır); Diğer
ro-RO: Nivelul de asamblare al kitului de avion cu telecomandă: ARF (Aproape gata de zbor); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (Kit neasamblat); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Gata pentru receptor); RTF (Gata de zbor); Altele
da: Fjernbetjent flysæts kompletteringsniveau: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (Usamlet sæt); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Ready-to-Fly); Andet
th: เครื่องบินควบคุมระยะไกลสำหรับการสอบสวนระดับงาน: ARF (เกือบพร้อมบิน); BNF (เชื่อมต่อแล้วบินได้เลย); KIT (ชุดเครื่องมือที่ยังไม่ได้ประกอบ); PNP (พลักแอนด์เพลย์); RR (พร้อมรับสัญญาณ); RTF (พร้อมบิน); อื่นๆ
el: Βαθμός ολοκλήρωσης του κιτ τηλεκατευθυνόμενου αεροπλάνου: ARF (Σχεδόν έτοιμο για πτήση); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); ΚΙΤ (Μη συναρμολογημένο κιτ); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Έτοιμο για δέκτη); RTF (Έτοιμο για πτήση); Άλλο
ru: Степень комплектности набора радиоуправляемого самолета: ARF (почти готов к полету); BNF (готов к привязке); KIT (набор для сборки); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (готов к установке приемника); RTF (готов к полету); Другое
zh-CN: 遥控飞机套件完成度: ARF（近乎即飞）; BNF（对频即飞）; KIT（未组装套件）; PNP（即插即用）; RR（接收机就绪）; RTF（到手即飞）; 其他
nl: RC-vliegtuig kit voltooiingsniveau: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (ongemonteerd); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Ready-to-Fly); Overig
cs: Úroveň úplnosti sady letounu na dálkové ovládání: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (nesestavený model); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Ready-to-Fly); Jiné
pt-BR: Controle remoto avião kit conclusão nível: ARF (quase pronto para voar); BNF (conectar e voar); KIT (kit desmontado); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (pronto para receptor); RTF (pronto para voar); Outro
pl: Poziom realizacji zestawu zdalnego sterowania płaszczyzną: ARF (prawie gotowy do lotu); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (zestaw do samodzielnego montażu); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (gotowy pod odbiornik); RTF (gotowy do lotu); Inne
vi: Mức độ hoàn thiện của bộ dụng cụ máy bay điều khiển từ xa: ARF (Gần như sẵn sàng bay); BNF (Kết nối và bay); KIT (Bộ chưa lắp ráp); PNP (Cắm và chạy); RR (Sẵn sàng nhận tín hiệu); RTF (Sẵn sàng bay); Khác
bg-BG: Ниво на комплектовка на радиоуправляем самолетен комплект: ARF (Почти готов за полет); BNF (Свържи и лети); KIT (Несглобен комплект); PNP (Включи и играй); RR (Готов за приемник); RTF (Готов за полет); Други
ja: 遠隔操作飛行機キット完成レベル: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF（Bind-N-Fly）; KIT（未組立キット）; PNP（Plug-N-Play）; RR（Receiver-Ready）; RTF (Ready-to-Fly); その他
sl-SI: Stopnja dokončanosti kompleta daljinsko vodenega letala: ARF (skoraj pripravljeno za let); BNF (poveži in poleti); KIT (nesestavljen komplet); PNP (priključi in uporabljaj); RR (pripravljeno za sprejemnik); RTF (pripravljeno za let); Drugo
it: Livello di completamento del kit per aereo telecomandato: ARF (Quasi pronto al volo); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (Kit da montare); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Pronto al volo); Altro
de: Komplettierungsgrad des RC-Flugzeug-Kits: ARF (Almost-Ready-to-Fly); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (unmontierter Bausatz); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Receiver-Ready); RTF (Ready-to-Fly); Sonstiges
lt-LT: Nuotoliniu būdu valdomo lėktuvo rinkinio komplektacijos lygis: ARF (Beveik paruoštas skristi); BNF (Susiek ir skrisk); KIT (Nesurinktas rinkinys); PNP (Prijunk ir žaisk); RR (Paruoštas imtuvas); RTF (Paruoštas skristi); Kitas
hr-HR: Razina dovršenosti kompleta za daljinsko upravljanje avionom: ARF (Gotovo spremno za let); BNF (Bind-N-Fly); KIT (Nesastavljeni komplet); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (Spremno za prijemnik); RTF (Spremno za let); Ostalo
hu: Távirányítású repülőgépkészlet összeállítottsági szintje: ARF (majdnem repülésre kész); BNF (kösd és repülj); KIT (összeszerelésre váró készlet); PNP (Plug-N-Play); RR (vevőre kész); RTF (repülésre kész); Egyéb
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan lentokoneen pakkauksen täysimittaisuusaste: ARF (melkein lentovalmis); BNF (sido ja lennä); Kokoamaton sarja (KIT); PNP (plug-and-play); RR (vastaanotinvalmis); RTF (lentovalmis); Muu